Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.785

Criminal justice services—Consolidation—Establishment of program.

The legislature finds that there is a need for the Washington state patrol to establish a program which will consolidate existing programs of criminal justice services within its jurisdiction so that such services may be more effectively utilized by the criminal justice agencies of this state. The chief shall establish such a program which shall include but not be limited to the identification section, all auxiliary systems including the Washington crime information center and the teletypewriter communications network, the drug control assistance unit, and any other services the chief deems necessary which are not directly related to traffic control.

[ 1999 c 151 s 1102; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 18.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.